Massachusetts, session 194th, H5125.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 125 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 22. No administrator or superintendent of any correctional facility, shall transfer
any inmate or prisoner outside of the commonwealth; and no inmate or prisoner of any
correctional facility, shall be transferred outside of the commonwealth, for the purpose of
engaging in labor outside of the Commonwealth. This section shall not apply if the Governor
determines that an emergency in another state or territory creates the need for inmates or
prisoners to be transferred for the purpose of engaging in labor outside of the Commonwealth
and the inmate or prisoner to be transferred agrees to be transferred in writing. Nothing in this
section shall be interpreted to prevent the transfer of inmates and prisoners for non-labor
purposes consistent with Chapter 125.
of 1